New Mexico, session 2026, SB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) is appropriated from the government results and opportunity program fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the KANW educational radio station to purchase equipment and add resources for reporters to cover rural New Mexico news. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the government results and opportunity program fund. .233442.1